Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.583

Marbled murrelet advisory committee. (Contingent expiration date.)

(1) To assist the department in developing and providing the report to the legislature required in RCW 43.30.582, the commissioner must appoint a marbled murrelet advisory committee.

(2) The marbled murrelet advisory committee may include one or more representatives from the following categories:

(a) State trust lands beneficiaries;

(b) Impacted state forestlands beneficiaries, including counties;

(c) Junior taxing districts;

(d) Environmental organizations;

(e) Local governments or an association representing local governments;

(f) Milling interests or an association representing milling interests;

(g) Private forestland owners or a statewide association representing private forestland owners; and

(h) Local public interest groups.

(3) The advisory committee required under this section may consult with relevant state and federal agencies and tribes.

[ 2018 c 255 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent expiration date—2018 c 255 ss 2 and 3: See note following RCW 43.30.582.

Findings—Intent—2018 c 255: See note following RCW 43.30.582.